Illinois, session 104th, HB3806.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Curriculum Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Online transparency.7    (a) For purposes of this Section:8    "Action-oriented civics learning assignments or projects" 9includes assignments or projects that require students to 10contact elected officials or advocate for a political or 11social cause or to participate in political or social 12demonstrations.13    "Guest lecture" includes a presentation or educational 14event conducted by an outside individual or organization, 15including those facilitated by a school's staff. "Guest 16lecture" does not include a student presentation given by 17students enrolled at a school.18    "Lesson plan" means the daily, weekly, or other routinely 19produced guide, description, or outline of the instruction to 20be provided by a teacher to students at a school.21    "Materials and activities used for student instruction" 22includes, but is not limited to, learning materials or 23activities from which students are required to choose one or   HB3806- 2 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1more from a selection of materials that is restricted to 2specific titles, such as the titles of books in a teacher's 3classroom library.4    "Service-learning projects" includes both of the 5following:6        (1) any requirement to participate in internships or 7    other forms of collaboration with outside organizations 8    after regular school hours for course credit or as a class 9    project or assignment; and10        (2) the specific internships or organizations selected 11    by students if the selection is made from a list of 12    specific internships or organizations provided by the 13    school or its staff.14    "Used for student instruction" means assigned, 15distributed, or otherwise presented to students in any course 16for which students receive academic credit or in any 17educational capacity in which a school requires the student 18body to participate or in which a majority of students in a 19given grade level participate.20    (b) Each school that is operated by a school district or as 21a public charter school shall disclose, on a publicly 22accessible portion of the school's website or, at the school 23district's discretion, the school district's website, all of 24the following:25        (1) The procedures or processes in effect for the 26    school principal or other staff to document, review, or   HB3806- 3 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1    approve lesson plans or the learning materials and 2    activities used for student instruction at the school.3        (2) A listing of the teacher and staff training 4    materials and activities used at the school in the current 5    school year.6        (3) A listing of the learning materials and activities 7    used for student instruction at the school in the current 8    school year, including at least the following, organized, 9    at a minimum, by subject area, grade, and teacher:10            (A) Textbooks, articles, and other required 11        reading materials; videos and audio recordings; 12        digital materials; websites; instructional handouts 13        and worksheets; device-based applications, including, 14        but not limited to, smartphone, laptop, or 15        tablet-based applications; materials and topics 16        presented at grade-level or schoolwide assemblies; 17        guest lectures; action-oriented civics learning 18        assignments or projects; and service-learning 19        projects.20            (B) The title, author, or organization and, if 21        accessed online, the uniform resource locator (URL) 22        associated with the material or activity.23    (c) The school shall list the required materials and 24activities online not more than 10 school days after the first 25use of each material or activity. The list shall be accessible 26via the school's website for at least 2 years and   HB3806- 4 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1electronically searchable or sortable by grade, course or 2subject title, and teacher name. The listing of materials and 3activities pursuant to subsection (b) shall be created and 4displayed in searchable or sortable electronic formats. The 5school or school district may use collaborative, cloud-based 6document or spreadsheet software or an online learning 7management system that allows multiple authorized users to 8update or add to posted content on an ongoing basis, as long as 9the information is publicly accessible via a visible link 10posted in a conspicuous manner on the school's website.11    (d) This Section does not require:12        (1) The digital reproduction of the learning materials 13    or activities.14        (2) The posting or distribution of any material or 15    activity in a manner that would constitute an infringement 16    of copyright under the federal Copyright Act of 1976.17        (3) The listing of materials and activities used (i) 18    at a school site with fewer than 30 enrolled students or 19    (ii) solely for individualized special education 20    instruction as part of an individualized education program 21    under Article 14 of the School Code or materials and 22    activities used solely for students with a disability 23    under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 24    1973. 25    Section 10. Parental access.  HB3806- 5 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1    (a) Neither the State Board of Education nor the school 2district's school board or public charter school's governing 3body nor any staff employed by the school district or charter 4school and acting in the course of their official duties shall 5purchase or contract for copyrighted learning materials to be 6used for student instruction at a school, including the 7renewal of subscription-based materials for which students are 8provided individual login credentials or access via electronic 9personal devices, unless provision is made to allow the 10parents and guardians of enrolled students to review the 11materials within 10 school days after the submission of a 12written request to the school. The means of provision shall 13include at least one the following:14        (1) Providing access to the materials at the school 15    site during the school's normal hours of operation within 16    10 school days after a written request.17        (2) Providing temporary remote access or login 18    credentials to at least one copy of the material for 19    review for at least a 24-hour period following each 20    request, not to exceed one request per piece of material 21    per household during each 30-day period.22    (b) As used in this subsection (b), "nondisclosure 23agreement" means a confidentiality agreement or contract 24provision that prohibits the disclosure of information by a 25party to the contract.26    The parent or guardian reviewing copyrighted digital   HB3806- 6 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1materials must not be required, as a condition of reviewing 2the materials, to enter into terms of a nondisclosure 3agreement nor waive any rights beyond complying with federal 4copyright law. 5    Section 15. Enforcement. A party may not initiate legal 6action to enforce Section 5 or 10 unless the party adheres to 7the following process:8        (1) The party, which shall be limited to the State 9    Superintendent of Education, the Attorney General, the 10    State's Attorney for the county in which an alleged 11    violation occurs, or a student or the parent or guardian 12    of a student enrolled in the school district or charter 13    school in which an alleged violation of this Section 14    occurs, shall submit a complaint in writing with the 15    specific facts of the alleged violation to the school 16    district's school board or the charter school's governing 17    body or to an administrator designated by the school board 18    or governing body. The party may not submit more than one 19    complaint of an alleged violation in any 30-day period. 20    The complainant may identify multiple materials within a 21    single course or across courses that have not been posted 22    or provided in compliance with Section 5 or 10. The board 23    or administrator shall investigate the complaint and 24    respond in writing, including a description of any action 25    taken to resolve the complaint, within 15 calendar days   HB3806- 7 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1    after receiving the written complaint.2        (2) If the action taken by the school district's 3    school board or charter school's governing body or the 4    designated administrator does not resolve the complaint in 5    a manner that ensures compliance with this Act, the State 6    Superintendent of Education, the Attorney General, the 7    State's Attorney for the county in which an alleged 8    violation occurs, or a student or the parent or guardian 9    of a student enrolled in the school district or charter 10    school in which an alleged violation of this Act occurs, 11    may initiate a suit in the district court in the county in 12    which the alleged violation occurs to bring action for 13    injunctive relief or a writ of mandamus to compel the 14    school district's school board or charter school's 15    governing body to comply with this Act. If a student or 16    parent or guardian of a student prevails, the court shall 17    award reasonable attorney's fees to the prevailing party.18        (3) If the employment of an individual at the school 19    has been discontinued or an Internet address that 20    functioned at the time of the initial posting subsequently 21    ceases to function, the school district's school board or 22    charter school's governing body may not be held liable for 23    not posting or updating the listing of materials required 24    in Section 5 beyond what has previously been posted.25        (4) An attorney acting on behalf of a school district 26    or charter school may request a legal opinion of the   HB3806- 8 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1    Attorney General or the State's Attorney for the county in 2    which an alleged violation of Section 5 or 10 occurs as to 3    whether the actions taken by the school district or 4    charter school comply. 5    Section 90. The School Code is amended by changing Section 627A-5 as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/27A-5)8    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)9    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 10    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 11nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 12school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 13corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 14authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.15    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 16by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 17school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 18new applications to establish a charter school in a city 19having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 20charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 21does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 22before April 16, 2003.23    (b-5) (Blank). 24    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by   HB3806- 9 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 2provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 3school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 4the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 5or other governing body must include at least one parent or 6guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 7who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 8network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 9directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 10Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 11    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 12year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 13school's board of directors or other governing body shall 14complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 15leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 16familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 17responsibilities, including financial oversight and 18accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 19school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 20Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 21and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 22voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 23other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 24professional development training in these same areas. The 25training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 26a statewide charter school membership association or may be   HB3806- 10 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 2the State Board. 3    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 4health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 5requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 6preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 7students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 8prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 9school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 10requirement" does not include any course of study or 11specialized instructional requirement for which the State 12Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 13designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 14to master and apply as an outcome of their education.15    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 16health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 17under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 18promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 19non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 20school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 21than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 22school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 23requires the charter school to follow the list of all 24non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 25the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 26requirements added by the State Board to such list during the   HB3806- 11 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 2an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 3requirements in a charter school contract that are not 4contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 5including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 6authorizing local school board. 7    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 8charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 9charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 10instructional materials, and student activities.11    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 12management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 13not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 14charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 15outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 16school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 17school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 18in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 19To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 20funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 21charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 22Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 23charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 24Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 25financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 26require quarterly financial statements from each charter   HB3806- 12 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1school. 2    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 3this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 4all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 5schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 6of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 7exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 8governing public schools and local school board policies; 9however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:10        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 11    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 12    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 13    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 14    for employment;15        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 16    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;17        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 18    Tort Immunity Act;19        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 20    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 21    officers, directors, employees, and agents;22        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;23        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 24    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;25        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;26        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school   HB3806- 13 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1    report cards;2        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;3        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 4    prevention;5        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 6    discipline reporting;7        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;8        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;9        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;10        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;11        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 12        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;13        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;14        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;15        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;16        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;17        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;18        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 19        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code;20        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;21        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 22        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 23    10-20.56 of this Code; 24        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 25        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 26        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code;   HB3806- 14 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;2        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code;3        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 4        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 5        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;6        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and7        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code; and .8        (38) the Curriculum Transparency Act.9    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 10(g) is declaratory of existing law.11    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 12school district, the governing body of a State college or 13university or public community college, or any other public or 14for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 15school building and grounds or any other real property or 16facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 17for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 18maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 19activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 20to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 21Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 22district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 23use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 24services for which a charter school contracts with a school 25district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 26services for which a charter school contracts with a local   HB3806- 15 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1school board or with the governing body of a State college or 2university or public community college shall be provided by 3the public entity at cost.4    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 5by converting an existing school or attendance center to 6charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 7deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 8agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 9costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 10facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 11subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 12local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.13    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 14or grade level.15    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 16Board, then the charter school is its own local education 17agency. 18(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 19102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-522, eff. 208-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 21102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 102-805, eff. 221-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, 23eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 24103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-9-24.) 25    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)  HB3806- 16 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 2    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 3nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 4school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 5corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 6authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.7    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 8by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 9school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 10new applications to establish a charter school in a city 11having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 12charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 13does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 14before April 16, 2003.15    (b-5) (Blank). 16    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 17its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 18provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 19school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 20the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 21or other governing body must include at least one parent or 22guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 23who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 24network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 25directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 26Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent.   HB3806- 17 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 2year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 3school's board of directors or other governing body shall 4complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 5leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 6familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 7responsibilities, including financial oversight and 8accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 9school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 10Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 11and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 12voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 13other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 14professional development training in these same areas. The 15training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 16a statewide charter school membership association or may be 17provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 18the State Board. 19    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 20health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 21requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 22preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 23students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 24prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 25school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 26requirement" does not include any course of study or   HB3806- 18 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1specialized instructional requirement for which the State 2Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 3designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 4to master and apply as an outcome of their education.5    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 6health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 7under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 8promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 9non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 10school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 11than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 12school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 13requires the charter school to follow the list of all 14non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 15the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 16requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 17term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 18an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 19requirements in a charter school contract that are not 20contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 21including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 22authorizing local school board. 23    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 24charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 25charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 26instructional materials, and student activities.  HB3806- 19 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 2management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 3not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 4charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 5outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 6school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 7school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 8in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 9To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 10funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 11charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 12Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 13charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 14Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 15financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 16require quarterly financial statements from each charter 17school. 18    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 19this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 20all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 21schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 22of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 23exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 24governing public schools and local school board policies; 25however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:26        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code   HB3806- 20 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 2    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 3    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 4    for employment;5        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 6    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;7        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 8    Tort Immunity Act;9        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 10    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 11    officers, directors, employees, and agents;12        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;13        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 14    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;15        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;16        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 17    report cards;18        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;19        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 20    prevention;21        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 22    discipline reporting;23        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;24        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;25        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;26        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;  HB3806- 21 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 2        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;3        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;4        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;5        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;6        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;7        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;8        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 9        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code; 10        (24) Article 26A of this Code;11        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;12        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 13        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 14    10-20.56 of this Code; 15        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 16        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 17        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 18        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;19        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code; 20        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 21        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 22        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;23        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and24        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code; and .25        (38) the Curriculum Transparency Act.26    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection   HB3806- 22 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1(g) is declaratory of existing law.2    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 3school district, the governing body of a State college or 4university or public community college, or any other public or 5for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 6school building and grounds or any other real property or 7facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 8for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 9maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 10activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 11to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 12Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 13district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 14use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 15services for which a charter school contracts with a school 16district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 17services for which a charter school contracts with a local 18school board or with the governing body of a State college or 19university or public community college shall be provided by 20the public entity at cost.21    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 22by converting an existing school or attendance center to 23charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 24deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 25agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 26costs for the operation and maintenance of school district   HB3806- 23 -LRB104 08895 LNS 18950 b1facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 2subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 3local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.4    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 5or grade level.6    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 7Board, then the charter school is its own local education 8agency. 9(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 10102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-466, eff. 117-1-25; 102-522, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, 12eff. 12-3-21; 102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 13102-805, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 146-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, 15eff. 7-1-24; 103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; 16revised 11-26-24.) 17    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 18changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 19that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 20represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 21not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 22made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 23Public Act.